Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 2

Commission, Oath, And Bond

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

21-2-101. Officers commissioned by Governor.

Each Justice of the Supreme Court, judge of a circuit court, presiding judge of a county court, the Secretary of State, the Auditor of State, prosecuting attorney, sheriff, coroner, clerk of a circuit court, county treasurer, county surveyor, notary public, justice of the peace, judge of a district court, mayor of a city or town, and militia officer elected or appointed in this state shall be commissioned by the Governor.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 27, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 1428; Pope's Dig., § 1675; Acts 1955, No. 24, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-201.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was enacted before the establishment of the Court of Appeals in 1979.

Cross References. Issuance of commissions, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 10.

Officers commissioned by Governor, Ark. Const., Art. 7, § 48.

Secretary of State to attest commissions issued by Governor, §25-16-403.

21-2-102. Commission fee and duplicate oath to be forwarded to Secretary of State.

With the exception of judges elected at the nonpartisan judicial general election without a runoff, all civil and military state and county officers who are required by law to be commissioned by the Governor are required to forward the legal fee for their commissions to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after their election.

All judges elected at the nonpartisan judicial general election without a runoff are required to forward the legal fee for their commissions to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after the November general election.

Within fifteen (15) days after the commissions have been received, the officers shall forward their duplicate oaths to the Secretary of State to be recorded and filed in his or her office.

In case any officer, elected or appointed and commissioned by the Governor, shall fail or neglect to apply for or procure his or her commission from the office of the Secretary of State within the time specified in subsection (a) of this section or shall, after the commission has been obtained, fail or neglect to forward to the office of the Secretary of State his or her duplicate oath for recordation in that office, within the time specified, then the office to which that person was commissioned shall be deemed vacant.

The Governor, on being satisfied from the official records of the office of the Secretary of State, by reason of any of the causes enumerated in this section, shall proceed to fill the vacancy in the manner provided by law.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “With the exception … and military” for “All” and deleted “both civil and military” following “officers”; added (a)(2); redesignated former (a)(2) as present (a)(3); and made stylistic and gender neutral changes.

Subsection (a) of this section is constitutional. Boyett v. Cowling, 78 Ark. 494, 94 S.W. 682 (1906).

The Secretary of State shall account for the fee to the State Treasury as directed in § 21-6-202.

Date of qualification; and

Mailing address.

A justice or judge of the:

Supreme Court;

Court of Appeals; or

Circuit court;

The county clerk; or

The clerk of the circuit court.

The justices of the Supreme Court, judges of the Court of Appeals, judges of the circuit courts, judges of the district court, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, and Auditor of State shall take their oaths before:

The Governor;

A justice or judge of the:

Supreme Court;

Court of Appeals; or

Circuit court;

The clerk of the county court; or

The clerk of the circuit court.

All other officers, both civil and military, shall take their oaths before:

The Secretary of State or his or her official designee;

A justice or judge of the:

Supreme Court;

Court of Appeals;

Circuit court;

District court; or

County court;

The clerk of the county court;

The clerk of the circuit court;

A justice of the peace;

A clerk of a city of the first class; or

A recorder of a city of the second class or incorporated town.

However, if the officer is serving in or with the United States Armed Forces, he or she may take the oath of office before any commissioned officer in active service of the United States Armed Forces with the rank of second lieutenant or higher in the United States Army, United States Air Force, or United States Marine Corps, or ensign or higher in the United States Navy or United States Coast Guard.

The oath shall not be rendered invalid by failure to recite a venue or to state the place of execution of the oath, nor is a special form of jurat of affidavit or any authentication thereof required, provided it appears on the instrument that the person taking the oath is a commissioned officer provided for in this section.(d)(1)If necessary, a county or district official listed under subsection (a) of this section may act as a holdover officer and administer the oath of office to any incoming county or district official, including without limitation his or her successor.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment inserted “Air Force” in (b); substituted “or” for “nor” in (c); and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted “judges of the Court of Appeals” and “judges of the district courts” in (a)(2), and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment by No. 582 rewrote (a).

The 2011 amendment by No. 612 added (d).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(3)(F) and (a)(3)(G).

Although a municipal court clerk can administer oaths under §16-17-211, subdivision (a)(3) dictates that a municipal judge can only receive his oath of office from certain designated persons, who do not include a municipal court clerk. City of Crossett v. Switzer, 302 Ark. 239, 788 S.W.2d 738 (1990) (decision under prior law).

When the original of any bond provided for or covered by this section shall be lost or destroyed, the record of the bond provided for in this section shall be deemed the original, and suit may be instituted on the recorded bond.

When any bond is required of any officer as described in subsection (a) of this section, then the Governor, county judge, mayor, or board of directors of the political entity affected may, in their discretion, make an order providing that the State Treasury or the treasury of a county, city, town, or district shall be drawn upon for the purpose of paying, and in such amount as may be necessary to pay, the expenses of premiums of surety bonds required by this section.

This section is cumulative and supplemental to all existing statutes. It shall repeal, alter, or modify them only where in direct conflict therewith.

This section does not offend against constitutional provision relating to sureties on official bonds. Gower v. Looney, 199 Ark. 272, 133 S.W.2d 451 (1939).

This section is mandatory, and a bond not in compliance with this section in that it was signed by individuals was without validity. Gower v. Looney, 199 Ark. 272, 133 S.W.2d 451 (1939).

History.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 21, §§ 1, 2, p. 22; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1430, 1431; Pope's Dig., §§ 1677, 1678; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-202, 12-206; Acts 2003, No. 1298, § 1.

21-2-103. Sending commission fees directly to Treasurer of State — Issuance of commission.

Any officer entitled to a commission may send the fee for the commission to the Treasurer of State, who shall at once execute duplicate receipts for the fee.

(1)The Treasurer of State shall present the receipts to the Auditor of State, who shall countersign them and charge the amount therein specified to the Treasurer of State.

The Treasurer of State shall then file one (1) of the receipts with the Auditor of State and the other with the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State shall immediately forward the commission to the officer.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 50, § 3, p. 73; C. & M. Dig., § 1429; Pope's Dig., § 1676; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-205.

21-2-104. District, county, and township officers — Issuance of commissions — Collection of fees.

(1)The Secretary of State is authorized, after each general election in this state, and as soon as the full returns of the election in any county are received by him or her, to issue and forward the commissions of all the newly elected district, county, and township officers required by law to be commissioned to the county or circuit clerks of the respective counties for delivery to the person entitled to them.

The clerks shall collect the fees required to be paid for the commissions, before the delivery thereof, and return the fee, or the commissions when default is made, to the Secretary of State.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk, upon receipt of the commissions from the Secretary of State for the several officers of his or her county, to notify each elected officer of the receipt of the commission and to enter the commission in a well-bound book which shall be kept for that purpose and shall be ruled and divided into columns in the following order:

Name of officer;

Title of office;

Date of commission;

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 1, p. 167; 1881, No. 40, §§ 1, 2, p. 73; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-203, 12-204.

21-2-105. Administration of oaths generally.

(1)The Governor shall take the oath of office before:

Upon the completion of the oath:

The outgoing officer immediately vacates his or her position; and

The incoming officer assumes all the rights, privileges, and duties of his or her respective office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 106, § 1; Acts 1845, § 1, p. 61; C. & M. Dig., § 8074; Pope's Dig., § 10403; Acts 1945, No. 3, § 1; 1977, No. 531, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-207; Acts 1999, No. 641, § 1; 2009, No. 633, § 19; 2011, No. 582, §
1; 2011, No. 612, §
1;
2019, No. 194, § 1.

21-2-106. Endorsement of oath on commission.

It shall be the duty of every officer administering the oath of office to any officer of this state to endorse the oath on the commission of the officer.

However, if the officer is serving in or with the United States Armed Forces at the time his or her oath is taken and the oath is taken before a commissioned officer in the manner provided in §21-2-105, the oath may be attached to the commission of the officer whose oath is taken in lieu of being endorsed thereon.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 106, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 8075; Pope's Dig., § 10404; Acts 1945, No. 3, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-208.

21-2-107. Bonds of state, county, and district officers generally.

The official bonds of all state, county, and district officers required by law to furnish official bonds shall be executed by those officials as principal and shall be executed by some surety company authorized to do business in Arkansas as surety.

(1)The official bonds of all state officers covered by subsection (a) of this section shall be filed in the offices of the Secretary of State and the Auditor of State, with the original's being filed in the office of the Secretary of State and a true and correct copy thereof filed in the office of the Auditor of State.

The official bonds of all county officers covered by subsection (a) of this section shall be filed in the office of the recorder in the county in which the officers are elected or appointed.

The official bonds of all district officers covered by subsection (a) of this section shall be filed in the office of the recorder of the county in which the district officer resides.

The recorders of the various counties whose duty it is to file the bonds under the provisions of this section, shall maintain a special record book and shall record therein each official bond filed as provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 329, §§ 1-7, 9; Pope's Dig., §§ 10415-10421, 10423; Acts 1939, No. 89, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-212 — 12-219.

21-2-108. Duration of bond.

All official bonds shall be executed for a definite period not to exceed two (2) years.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 331, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-240.

21-2-109. Payment of premium on bonds.

If state, county, or city officials, including officials of incorporated towns, required to give bond for the faithful performance of their duties and the paying over of funds which may come into their hands shall elect to make a corporate surety bond in a guaranty or bonding company authorized to do business within the state, then the state, county, city, or incorporated town, as the case may be, shall pay the premium on the bonds.

History.

Acts 1927, No. 85, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 10439; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-220.

21-2-110. Liability of surety generally.

The surety on an official's bond shall be liable for losses or other liabilities covered by the bond which occur within the term to which the bond applies, regardless of when the loss or liability is discovered.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 331, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-239.

21-2-111. Discharge of sureties on official bonds.

Any person bound as surety in any bond given by an officer for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office, whether the office is held under an election or an appointment by the laws of the state or by any ordinance or resolution of any municipal corporation in this state, or by appointment by a board of any municipal corporation in this state, may be discharged from all future liability on the official bond upon his or her petition in writing adduced to the court authorized by law to take and approve the official bond.

In the event the bond is not required to be approved by a particular court, then his or her petition in writing shall be adduced to the circuit court of the county in which the bond is given and required to be filed.

The petition shall set forth the facts upon which the application for a discharge is founded and shall be verified by the affidavit of the petitioner.

A notice in writing of the intended application, together with a copy of the petition, shall be personally served on the principal in the bond at least twenty (20) days before the making of the application.

If the principal in the bond has been absent from the state for the period of six (6) months, the publication of notice and petition, for three (3) successive weeks, in some newspaper printed in this state shall be a sufficient service of notice.

The court to whom the petition is addressed shall hear the application and may, on examination thereof, in its discretion, make an order requiring the principal in the bond to give new bond and security for the performance of his or her official duties.

If new bond and security is given, it shall be taken, approved, filed, and recorded in the same manner that the official bond of the officer is required by law to be taken, approved, and recorded.

When a new bond is taken, approved, and filed, it shall immediately operate as a discharge of all the securities on the former bond from all liability arising from any subsequent misconduct or default of the principal therein. The securities on the former bond shall thenceforth be liable on that bond only for breaches thereof which happened prior to the taking, approving, and filing of the new bond.

This section embraces guardian's bonds, and the securities in those bonds may apply by petition to require the guardian to give a new bond. Dempsey v. Fenno, 16 Ark. 491 (1855).

The county court can discharge the sureties on the bond of the county treasurer and require a new bond, but it cannot discharge the sureties from liabilities already incurred. Ex parte Talbot, 32 Ark. 424 (1877).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 137, §§ 10-16; Acts 1899, No. 14, § 1, p. 13; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8297-8303; Pope's Dig., §§ 10874-10880; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-228 — 12-234.

21-2-112. Remedy of surety against principal and cosureties.

Any person bound as a security in any bond given by an officer to secure the faithful performance of his or her duties, who shall pay any money he or she shall have been liable to pay by reason of the bond, shall have the same right and remedy against the principal and cosureties as are provided in this section and §21-2-111 against principal and security in bonds, bills, or notes for the payment of money or the delivery of property.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 137, § 17; C. & M. Dig., § 8304; Pope's Dig., § 10881; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-237.

21-2-113. Discrepancies in accounts — Effect on surety.

If any discrepancies are found in the accounts of an officer, the Auditor of State and the county clerk shall immediately notify the bonding company, and the penalties as prescribed in §§ 26-39-215, 26-39-501, and 26-39-502 shall not apply until sixty (60) days have expired from the official notification.

If the accounts are found to be correct, then, after final settlement has been made, the county clerk shall issue a quietus to the officer and shall forward a copy to the Auditor of State.

Issuance of a quietus shall automatically release bondsmen or sureties of the official from any and all liability on the bond in force for the term or part thereof covered by the final settlement.

However, if any discrepancy is found in the account of the county clerk or circuit clerk, the county judge shall immediately notify the bonding company.

History.

Acts 1927, No. 85, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 10443; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-236.

21-2-114. Bond required of people employed by public officials.

Each public official or employee of this state, or political subdivision thereof, who has appointed deputies or employed individuals who handle any funds for the performance of their duties shall bond the deputies and employees in those amounts which he or she deems necessary to indemnify the state or political subdivision for any loss or mishandling of funds by the deputies or employees.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 331, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1186, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-238; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1023, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1023, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1987, No. 1023, § 3, provided that nothing in that act shall repeal or supersede Acts 1985, No. 13, or any other law providing for blanket bonding of public officials or public employees.

21-2-115. Persons in armed forces — Oath — Bond.

Any person in the armed forces of the United States who has been granted leave of absence under §§ 21-4-301 — 21-4-304 and 21-4-306 — 21-4-313 may take and subscribe the official oath of office required by the Arkansas Constitution and statutes of this state at any time after his or her election and before he or she enters upon the duties of his or her office.

The oath may be administered by any officer of this state or of any other state or of the United States or of any foreign country who may administer oaths.

The person taking and subscribing the official oath of office under the terms of this section must cause the oath of office, together with the attestation of the oath or office, to be filed with the Secretary of State before entering upon the duties of his or her office.

Any person enumerated in subsection (a) of this section who is required by law to enter into a bond for the faithful performance of the duties of the office may execute and file the bond at any time within thirty (30) days after he or she shall have taken the official oath of office.

If the bond is not executed and filed within that time, the office shall be deemed and considered vacant.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted the subdivision (1) and (2) designations; in (a)(1), deleted “21-4-305 [repealed],” and “before any” at the end; and inserted “The oath may be administered by any” in (a)(2).

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the School District Public Employees Blanket Bond Program, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 188, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

21-2-201. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6001.

21-2-202. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6002.

21-2-203. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6009.

21-2-204. Acts 1985, No. 557, §§ 4, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-6004, 80-6006.

21-2-205. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6005.

21-2-206. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6007.

21-2-207. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6003.

21-2-208. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6010.

21-2-209. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6011.

21-2-210. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6012.

21-2-211. Acts 1985, No. 557, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-6008.

For present law on self-insured fidelity bond programs, see §21-2-701 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Municipal Public Employees Blanket Bond Program, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 188, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

21-2-301. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6101.

21-2-302. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6102.

21-2-303. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6109.

21-2-304. Acts 1985, No. 5, §§ 4, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-6104, 19-6106.

21-2-305. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6105.

21-2-306. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6107.

21-2-307. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 3; 1985, No. 380, § 2; 1985, No. 396, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6103.

21-2-308. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6110.

21-2-309. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6111.

21-2-310. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6112.

21-2-311. Acts 1985, No. 5, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-6108.

For present law on self-insured fidelity bond programs, see §21-2-701 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the County Public Employees Blanket Bond Program, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 188, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

21-2-401. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4301.

21-2-402. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4302.

21-2-403. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4309.

21-2-404. Acts 1985, No. 4, §§ 4, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 17-4304, 17-4306.

21-2-405. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4305.

21-2-406. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4307.

21-2-407. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 3; 1985, No. 380, § 1; 1985, No. 396, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4303.

21-2-408. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4310.

21-2-409. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4311.

21-2-410. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4312.

21-2-411. Acts 1985, No. 4, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-4308.

For present law regarding self-insured fidelity bond programs, see §21-2-701 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the State Public Employees Blanket Bond Program, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 188, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

21-2-501. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-254.

21-2-502. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-255.

21-2-503. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-261.

21-2-504. Acts 1985, No. 286, §§ 3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-256, 12-258.

21-2-505. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-257.

21-2-506. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-259.

21-2-507. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-262.

21-2-508. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-263.

21-2-509. Acts 1985, No. 286, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-260.

For present law on self-insured fidelity bond programs, see §21-2-701 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Public Employees Blanket Bond Program, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 188, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

21-2-601. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-241.

21-2-602. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-242.

21-2-603. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-249.

21-2-604. Acts 1985, No. 13, §§ 3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-243, 12-245.

21-2-605. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-244.

21-2-606. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-246.

21-2-607. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-252.

21-2-608. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-248.

21-2-609. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-251.

21-2-610. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-248.

21-2-611. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-253.

21-2-612. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-247.

21-2-613. Acts 1985, No. 13, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-250.

For present law on self-insured fidelity bond programs, see §21-2-701 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 339, § 5: Feb. 16, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that financial audits of governmental entities covered by the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program are necessary to maintain financial stability of the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program. This act is designed to accomplish this purpose for governmental entities or subdivisions thereof participating in the Program which are not audited by Arkansas Legislative Audit; and this act should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 208, § 2: Feb. 9, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas Code 21-2-704 refers to the term ‘participating governmental entities’ as one defined in Arkansas Code 21-2-702 but there is no definition for this term in that section, and this causes confusion, hinders the operation of the Governmental Bonding Board and creates uncertainty in how the term is interpreted that can be avoided by defining the term. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 506, § 54: Mar. 2, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws of this state as to insurance regulation and the Governmental Bonding Board, among others, are inadequate for the protection of the public, and the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to provide for the adequate protection of the public. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Am. Jur. 35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fid. Bonds, § 1 et seq.

Cited: In re Sutherland, 161 B.R. 657 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. 1993); Volunteer Council v. Governmental Bonding Bd., 319 Ark. 716, 894 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

History.

Acts 1945, No. 5, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-209 — 12-211; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 95.

Subchapter 2

— School District Public Employees Blanket Bond Program

21-2-201 — 21-2-211. [Repealed.]

21-2-301 — 21-2-311. [Repealed.]

21-2-401 — 21-2-411. [Repealed.]

21-2-501 — 21-2-509. [Repealed.]

21-2-601 — 21-2-613. [Repealed.]

21-2-701. Purpose.

It is found and determined that:

The State of Arkansas and the counties, municipalities, and school districts of the State of Arkansas are expending large sums of money each year for premiums on blanket bonds for officers and employees;

Considerable savings might be effected by the establishment of a self-insured fidelity bond program for state officials and employees, county officials and employees, municipal officials and employees, and school district officials and employees;

This subchapter is designed to establish a governmental bonding board to develop a self-insured fidelity bond program for those officials and employees; and

This subchapter is designed to provide that self-insured fidelity bonds would be in lieu of the various blanket bonds which are presently required under this chapter for various officials and employees and to thereby effectuate substantial savings in the cost of blanket bonds for those officials and employees.

The Fidelity Bond Program is designed to cover losses sustained by participating governmental entities. Volunteer Council v. Governmental Bonding Bd., 319 Ark. 716, 894 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 1.

21-2-702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Audit” or “audit report” means an audit or other statutorily allowed financial examination of the books and records;

“Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner;

“County” means the county or counties of the State of Arkansas;

“County public official” or “county public employee” means any elected officer of the counties and the employees or deputies of any elected officer, members of the quorum court, and the members of the various county boards and commissions, excluding officials and employees of county hospitals, county nursing homes, and conservation and improvement districts;

“Money” means currency, coins, and bank notes in current use and having a face value and travelers' checks, register checks, and money orders held for sale to the general public;

“Municipal” or “municipality” means the municipalities of the State of Arkansas;

“Municipal public official” or “municipal public employee” means any elected officer of the municipalities and the employees or deputies of any elected officer, specifically including salaried municipal employees of municipally owned utilities, members of the city council, including the mayor, and the members of the various municipal boards and commissions, but excluding officials and employees of municipal hospitals, nursing homes, and improvement districts;

“Participating governmental entity” means those organizations defined in subdivisions (3), (6), (10), and (13) of this section;

“Property other than money and securities” means any tangible property, other than money and securities, that has intrinsic value;

“School district” means the school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools of the State of Arkansas;

“School district public official” or “school district public employee” means all school district salaried officials and salaried school district employees, whether elected or appointed, and the members of local school boards of directors;

“Securities” means negotiable and nonnegotiable instruments or contracts representing either money or other property and includes:

Tokens, tickets, and revenue and other stamps in current use whether represented by actual stamps or unused value in a meter; and

Evidences of debt, other than money, issued in connection with credit or charge cards;

“State” means the State of Arkansas;

“State officers and employees” means all elected and appointed salaried officials of the state and their salaried state employees, the salaried officials and salaried employees of all state boards and commissions, members of the General Assembly, and nonsalaried appointed members of the various state boards and commissions; and

“State public official” or “state public employee” means any elected or appointed salaried officer of the State of Arkansas and the salaried governmental employees of that elected or appointed officer, members of the General Assembly, and the nonsalaried members of the various state boards and commissions.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment by Nos. 208 and 1038 added present (1) and (8) and placed the remaining subdivisions in alphabetical order.

The 2015 amendment inserted “and open-enrollment public charter schools” in (10).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 2; 1993, No. 319, § 1; 2001, No. 208, § 1; 2001, No. 1038, § 1; 2015, No. 846, § 37.